Hawaii statutes.
§6E-13 Injunctive relief. (a) In
addition to, and without limiting the other powers of the attorney general and
without altering or waiving any criminal penalty, civil, or administrative
provisions of this chapter, the attorney general shall have the power to bring
an action in the name of the State in any environmental court of competent
jurisdiction for restraining orders and injunctive relief to restrain and
enjoin violations or threatened violations of this chapter.

(b) Any person may maintain an action in the [environmental
court] having jurisdiction where the alleged violation occurred or is likely to
occur for restraining orders or injunctive relief against the State, its
political subdivisions, or any person upon a showing of irreparable injury, for
the protection of an historic property or a burial site and the public trust
therein from unauthorized or improper demolition, alteration, or transfer of
the property or burial site. [L 1976, c 104, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 306, §10;
am L 2003, c 104, §4; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Case Notes

Where (1) plaintiff had a legitimate interest in the iwi
found in Kakaako because plaintiff was a recognized cultural descendant of
those iwi, and (2) the rail project had a high likelihood of affecting the iwi,
those general factual allegations of injury resulting from defendant's conduct
were sufficient to establish that plaintiff had suffered an actual or
threatened irreparable injury under subsection (b). 128 H. 53, 283 P.3d 60
(2012).

Because: (1) subsection (b) allows a suit to be brought
only for a restraining order or injunctive relief and is an exception to the
sovereign immunity doctrine for which no waiver is necessary, and therefore
does not contain a waiver of the State's sovereign immunity; and (2) nothing
in article XI, §9 of the Hawaii constitution expressly waived the State's
immunity for attorney's fees, there was no clear relinquishment of the State's
sovereign immunity, and thus, the State's immunity barred petitioner's request
for fees based on the private attorney doctrine. 129 H. 454, 304 P.3d 252
(2013).

Where plaintiff asserted that: (1) plaintiff had family
members buried on the church grounds; (2) plaintiff was a native Hawaiian and a
recognized cultural descendant of the iwi found on the church grounds; (3)
plaintiff had a traditional and customary practice of caring for iwi; (4)
plaintiff was concerned that family members may be buried in unmarked burials
on the church grounds; and (5) the disturbance of unmarked burials of family members
or other cultural ancestors would cause plaintiff injury and harm, plaintiff
had standing to raise claims under this chapter. 128 H. 455 (App.), 290 P.3d
525 (2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next